Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202018-2410
Municipality, defined.

Municipality shall mean (1) any city or village incorporated under the laws of this state, any equivalent entity incorporated under the laws of another state, or any separate municipal utility which has autonomous control and was established by such a city, village, or equivalent entity or by the citizens thereof for the purpose of providing electric energy for such municipality, (2) any public entity organized under Chapter 70, article 6, and incorporated under the laws of this state for the sole purpose of providing wholesale electric energy to a single municipality which is incorporated under the laws of this state, or (3) any agency primarily comprised of municipalities.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 10;

Laws 1987, LB 324, § 3;

Laws 2003, LB 165, § 7;

Laws 2007, LB199, § 1;

Laws 2020, LB858, § 2.
August 07, 2020